Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.045, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Judicial review. new text begin (a) new text end Except for a prepaid health plan, any party who is aggrieved by an order of the commissioner of human services; the commissioner of health; or the commissioner of children, youth, and families in appeals within the commissioner's jurisdiction under subdivision 3b; or the Direct Care and Treatment executive board in appeals within the jurisdiction of the executive board under subdivision 5a may appeal the order deleted text begin to thedeleted text end new text begin innew text end district court deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (b) A party appealing under this subdivision must file: new text end new text begin (1) innew text end the county responsible for furnishing assistancedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end ordeleted text begin , indeleted text end new text begin (2) fornew text end appeals under subdivision 3bdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (i) innew text end the county where the maltreatment occurreddeleted text begin , by servingdeleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (ii) if the maltreatment occurred in another state or country, in the county where the alleged perpetrator or child alleged to have been maltreated resides. new text end new text begin (c) A party appealing under this subdivision must (1) servenew text end a written copy of a notice of appeal upon the applicable commissioner or executive board and any adverse party of record within 30 days after the date the commissioner or executive board issued the order, the amended order, or order affirming the original order, and deleted text begin by filingdeleted text end new text begin (2) filenew text end the original notice and proof of service with the court administrator of the district court. Service may be made personally or by mail; service by mail is complete upon mailing; no filing fee shall be required by the court administrator in appeals taken pursuant to this subdivision, with the exception of appeals taken under subdivision 3b. new text begin (d)new text end The applicable commissioner or executive board may elect to become a party to the proceedings in the district court. new text begin (e)new text end Except for appeals under subdivision 3b, any party may demand that the commissioner or executive board furnish all parties to the proceedings with a copy of the decision, and a transcript of any testimony, evidence, or other supporting papers from the hearing held before the human services judge, by serving a written demand upon the applicable commissioner or executive board within 30 days after service of the notice of appeal. new text begin (f)new text end Any party aggrieved by the failure of an adverse party to obey an order issued by the commissioner or executive board under subdivision 5 or 5a may compel performance according to the order in the manner prescribed in sections 586.01 to 586.12. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Maltreatment in another state or country. new text end new text begin The local welfare agency is the agency authorized to conduct a family assessment or investigation if a report alleges maltreatment that occurred in another state or country, if either the alleged perpetrator or the child alleged to have been maltreated resides in Minnesota. For purposes of this subdivision, an allegation of child maltreatment made or having occurred in the other state or country that constitutes child maltreatment in Minnesota is considered a report of child maltreatment within Minnesota at the time the incident occurred. new text end